Esperanto/epo.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +F +M +Dim +Aug +Acc +Nom ˆGUESSNOUNSTEM

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
ˆGUESSNOUNSTEM Nmf ; ! open class guess word
hund    Nmf;  ! dog
kat     Nmf;  ! cat
bird    Nmf;  ! bird
elefant Nmf;  ! elephant

LEXICON Nmf
+F:in    Nmf; 
+Aug:eg  Nmf;
+Dim:et  Nmf;
0:0      Nend;

LEXICON Nend
+N+Sg:o     Ncase ;
+N+Pl:oj    Ncase ;

LEXICON Ncase
+Acc:n      # ;
+Nom:0      # ;
